Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF47.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $316,430,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $344,211,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Office of Higher Education for the state grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 136A.121. If the appropriation in either fiscal year 2026 or fiscal year 2027 is insufficient, the appropriation for the other fiscal year is available for it. The base for this appropriation is $344,211,000 for fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. new text end